Utah statutes.
51-9-201.   Creation of Tobacco Settlement Restricted Account.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
the "Tobacco Settlement Restricted Account."
(2)  The account shall earn interest.
(3)  The account shall consist of:
(a)  until July 1, 2003, 50% of all funds of every kind that are received by
the state that are related to the settlement agreement that the state entered
into with leading tobacco manufacturers on November 23, 1998;
(b)  on and after July 1, 2003 and until July 1, 2004, 80% of all funds of
every kind that are received by the state that are related to the settlement
agreement that the state entered into with leading tobacco manufacturers on
November 23, 1998;
(c)  on and after July 1, 2004 and until July 1, 2005, 70% of all funds of
every kind that are received by the state that are related to the settlement
agreement that the state entered into with leading tobacco manufacturers on
November 23, 1998;
(d)  on and after July 1, 2005 and until July 1, 2007, 75% of all funds of
every kind that are received by the state that are related to the settlement
agreement that the state entered into with leading tobacco manufacturers on
November 23, 1998;
(e)  on and after July 1, 2007, 60% of all funds of every kind that are
received by the state that are related to the settlement agreement that the
state entered into with leading tobacco manufacturers on November 23, 1998;
and
(f)  interest earned on the account.
(4)  To the extent that funds will be available for appropriation in a given
fiscal year, those funds shall be appropriated from the account in the
following order:
(a) $10,452,900 to the Department of Health for the Children's Health
Insurance Program created in Section 26-40-103 and for restoration of dental
benefits in the Children's Health Insurance Program;
(b) $3,847,100 to the Department of Health for alcohol, tobacco, and other
drug prevention, reduction, cessation, and control programs that promote
unified messages and make use of media outlets, including radio, newspaper,
billboards, and television, and with a preference in funding given to tobacco-
related programs;
(c)  $193,700 to the Administrative Office of the Courts and $1,471,700 to the
Department of Human Services for the statewide expansion of the drug court
program;
(d)  $77,400 to the Board of Pardons, $81,700 to the Department of
Corrections, and $175,500 to the Department of Human Services for a drug board
pilot program;
(e)  $4,000,000 to the State Board of Regents for the University of Utah
Health Sciences Center to benefit the health and well-being of Utah citizens
through in-state research, treatment, and educational activities; and
(f)  any remaining funds as directed by the Legislature through appropriation.
(5) (a)  If tobacco funds in dispute for attorney fees are received by the
state, those funds shall be divided and deposited in accordance with
Subsection (3) and Section 51-9-202.
(b)  The amount appropriated from the Tobacco Settlement Restricted Account to
the Department of Health for alcohol, tobacco, and other drug programs
described in Subsection (4)(b), including the funding preference for tobacco-
related programs, shall be increased by up to $2,000,000 in a given fiscal
year to the extent that funds in dispute for attorney fees are available to
the state for appropriation from the account.
(6)  Each state agency identified in Subsection (4) shall provide an annual
report on the program and activities funded under Subsection (4) to:
(a)  the Health and Human Services Interim Committee no later than September
1; and
(b)  the Health and Human Services Appropriations Subcommittee.
